Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1228
Utility pole, defined.

Utility pole means a pole located in the right-of-way that is used for wireline communications, lighting, the vertical portion of support structures for traffic control signals or devices or a similar function, or for the collocation of small wireless facilities and located in the right-of-way. Utility pole does not include (1) wireless support structures, (2) any transmission infrastructure owned or operated by a public power supplier or rural public power supplier, and (3) any distribution or communications infrastructure owned or operated by a rural public power supplier.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 28.